Washington statutes.
RCW 17.28.170

Mosquito breeding places declared public nuisance—Abatement.

Any breeding place for mosquitoes which exists by reason of any use made of the land on which it is found or of any artificial change in its natural condition is a public nuisance: PROVIDED, That conditions or usage of land which are beyond the control of the landowner or are not contrary to normal, accepted practices of water usage in the district, shall not be considered a public nuisance.

The nuisance may be abated in any action or proceeding, or by any remedy provided by law.

[ 1959 c 64 s 2; 1957 c 153 s 17.]